test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    pístr+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: pístr
    pístr+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: pístr
    pístr+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: pístri
    pístr+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: písturs
    pístr+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: pístr
    pístr+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: pístr
    pístr+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: pístrum
    pístr+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: pístra
    pístr+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: pístrið
    pístr+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: pístrið
    pístr+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: pístrinum
    pístr+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: pístursins
    pístr+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: pístrini
    pístr+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: pístrini
    pístr+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: pístrunum
    pístr+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: pístranna
